New Jersey, session 222, A3149.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  An individual who is employed, either full-time or part-time, by a member of the Legislature to work in the legislative district office of that legislator as an aide, personal assistant, manager, advisor or secretary, or is otherwise compensated directly by that legislator for activities or services regarding legislative duties, shall not make a contribution of money or other thing of value greater than $30 per election to the legislators candidate committee or joint candidates committee.  No legislator or individual associated with the legislators candidate committee or joint candidates committee shall solicit or knowingly accept such a contribution. b.    Any individual found to be in violation of subsection a. of this section is guilty of a crime of the fourth degree. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.